District of Columbia statutes.
8-1031.02

Sustainable solid waste management hierarchy.

To the maximum extent practicable, the District shall direct its solid waste management policies and diversion activities in the following order of priority:

(1)

Source reduction and reuse;

(2)

Recycling or composting of solid waste, or conversion of compostable solid waste into biofuel; and

(3)

Landfill or incineration of solid waste.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 102, 61 DCR 9971

History